Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2600.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-102.01, to read: START_STATUTE15-102.01. Parental permission; student clubs and organizations; grades six through eight; definition A. A public school may not allow any student who is enrolled in any of grades six, seven or eight to participate in or join a student club or organization without first obtaining written permission from the student's parent.  When requesting permission from a student's parent for the purposes of this subsection, the public school shall include in the communication a description of the purpose, activities and supporters of the student club or organization. B. For the purposes of this section, "student club or organization": 1. Means any athletic team, association, order, society, corps, cooperative, club or other similar group that is affiliated with a public school and whose membership consists primarily of students enrolled at that public school. 2. includes any Club or activity described in section 15-102, subsection A, paragraph 7. END_STATUTE